Maine, session 132, LD1232.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4105 is enacted to read:
§4105. Radon permit
1. Radon permit. In addition to the requirements of the Maine Uniform Building and
Energy Code under Title 10, chapter 1103, new construction of or improvements or
alterations to a commercial structure requiring a building permit and new construction of a
residential structure must receive a radon permit under this section. For purposes of this
section, "radon" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 772, subsection 5.
2. Permit requirements. Requirements for a radon permit under subsection 1 are as
follows.
A. A person must be registered under Title 22, section 774 and must apply for a radon
permit and perform testing to determine the presence of radon and whether there is a
need for radon mitigation measures.
B. If the testing under paragraph A determines the need for radon mitigation measures,
a person must be registered under Title 22, section 775 and must design and install any
radon mitigation measures or equipment required to mitigate the radon.
3. Exemptions. This section does not apply to residential construction:
A. In a municipality that has not adopted a building code; or
B. Performed by the homeowner acting as the general contractor and who provides
more than 50% of the labor for framing and finishing the structure.
4. Violations. A person who violates this section:
A. For commercial construction, is subject to a penalty of $1,000; and
B. For residential construction, is subject to a penalty of $500.
A penalty under this subsection is payable to the division of environmental health within
the Department of Health and Human Services.